Maryland, session 2025, HB1148.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
27–501.
(U) (1) WITH RESPECT TO PROPERTY AND CASUALTY HOMEOWNER’S
INSURANCE OR RENTER’S INSURANCE, AN INSURER MAY NOT DENY COVERAGE
BASED ON A PRIOR LAPSE IN COVERAGE OF THE APPLICANT IF THE LAPSE IN
COVERAGE WAS:
(1) (I) DUE TO THE CHOICE OF THE APPLICANT; AND
(2) (II) NOT DUE TO LOSSES INCURRED BY OR THE CLAIMS HISTORY
OF THE APPLICANT.
(2) AN INSURER MAY REQUIRE THAT AN APPLICANT SUBMIT AN
AFFIDAVIT STATING THAT THE APPLICANT DID NOT INCUR A LOSS DURING THE
PRIOR LAPSE IN COVERAGE IF AN APPLICANT FOR RESIDENTIAL CONDOMINIUM
UNIT INSURANCE EXPERIENCES A LAPSE IN COVERAGE OF THE APPLICANT’S PRIOR
RESIDENTIAL CONDOMINIUM UNIT DUE TO AN INSURER’S WITHDRAWAL FROM THE
MARKET, AN INSURER FROM WHOM THE APPLICANT SEEKS NEW RESIDENTIAL
– 1 –

Ch. 381 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
CONDOMINIUM UNIT COVERAGE MAY NOT REFUSE TO ISSUE A POLICY BASED SOLELY
ON THE APPLICANT’S LAPSE IN COVERAGE ON THE UNIT IF:
(1) THE LAPSE IN COVERAGE WAS FOR NOT LONGER THAN 90 DAYS;
(2) IF REQUIRED BY THE NEW INSURER, THE APPLICANT PROVIDES AN
AFFIDAVIT THAT THE APPLICANT HAS NOT INCURRED ANY LOSSES DURING THE
LAPSE IN COVERAGE; AND
(3) THE APPLICANT PROVIDES ANY OTHER DOCUMENTATION
REQUIRED BY THE INSURER.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 1 of this Act shall
apply to new residential condominium unit insurance policies issued on or after January 1,
2026.
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 2 –